Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2331.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 30, chapter 6, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 30-812, to read: START_STATUTE30-812. Public power entity; generating capacity; reliable resources; definitions A. On or after January 1, 2030, a public power entity that serves more than one million customers in this state shall ensure that at least eighty-five percent of the generating capacity that is relied on to serve retail load customers consists of reliable resources. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Generating capacity": (a) Means the nameplate alternating current capacity, measured in megawatts, of electric generation resources that are owned, controlled, contracted for or otherwise relied on by a public power entity to serve retail load in this state. (b) Includes capacity from utility-owned resources and capacity from purchased power or tolling arrangements that provide capacity value to the public power entity. 2. "Intermittent availability" means resource availability that is primarily dependent on weather conditions, solar irradiance, wind speeds or other naturally variable conditions beyond the operator's control and that cannot be dispatched on demand to meet system needs as determined by the corporation commission. 3. "Reliable resource" means an electric generation resource that is dispatchable or is capable of providing baseload energy and that is not subject to intermittent availability, except for routine maintenance and repairs.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 40, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 40-207, to read: START_STATUTE40-207. Electric public service corporation; generating capacity; reliable resources; definitions A. On or after January 1, 2030, an electric public service corporation shall ensure that at least eighty-five percent of the generating capacity that is relied on to serve retail load customers consists of reliable resources. B. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Generating capacity": (a) Means the nameplate alternating current capacity, measured in megawatts, of electric generation resources that are owned, controlled, contracted for or otherwise relied on by an electric public service corporation to serve retail load in this state. (b) Includes capacity from utility-owned resources and capacity from purchased power or tolling arrangements that provide capacity value to the electric public service corporation. 2. "Intermittent availability" means resource availability that is primarily dependent on weather conditions, solar irradiance, wind speeds or other naturally variable conditions beyond the operator's control and that cannot be dispatched on demand to meet system needs as determined by the commission. 3. "Reliable resource" means an electric generation resource that is dispatchable or is capable of providing baseload energy and that is not subject to intermittent availability, except for routine maintenance and repairs.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Legislative intent The legislature intends that this act is necessary for the convenience, comfort and safety of and the preservation of the health of public service corporation patrons. Sec. 4. Short title This act may be cited as the "Energy Reliability Standards Act".